Maryland, session 2025, HB0987.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 13–1001.1 of Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis of the Annotated
Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 13–1001.2.
SECTION 1. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
OF MARYLAND, That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
13–102.
This title applies only in Baltimore County.
13–1001.1.
(A) (1) THERE IS A CLASS B–OB–CRD (OFFICE BUILDING –
COMMERCIAL REVITALIZATION DISTRICT) BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE.
(2) THE BOARD MAY NOT ISSUE MORE THAN ONE CLASS B–OB–CRD
LICENSE IN THE COUNTY.
(B) (1) THE CLASS B–OB–CRD LICENSE MAY BE ISSUED ONLY FOR A
RESTAURANT THAT:
(I) IS LOCATED IN:
1. THE TOWSON COMMERCIAL REVITALIZATION
DISTRICT, AS DEFINED BY THE BALTIMORE COUNTY COUNCIL; AND
2. AN OFFICE BUILDING THAT IS AT LEAST 100,000
SQUARE FEET IN SIZE;
(II) PREVIOUSLY HAD OR HAS A ZONING CLASSIFICATION OF
BM–D.T. BY THE COUNTY GOVERNMENT; AND
(III) IS AT LEAST 100 FEET FROM A PLACE OF WORSHIP.
(2) THE CLASS B–OB–CRD LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO
SELL:
(I) BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR FOR ON–PREMISES
CONSUMPTION; AND
(II) WINE FOR OFF–PREMISES CONSUMPTION IF THE WINE:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 797
1. IS PURCHASED ALONG WITH PREPARED FOOD OTHER
THAN PREPACKAGED SNACKS; AND
2. IS NOT DISPLAYED IN AN AREA ACCESSIBLE TO THE
PUBLIC.
(C) THE NUMBER OF SEATS AT THE BAR ON THE LICENSED PREMISES MAY
NOT EXCEED 25% OF THE TOTAL NUMBER OF SEATS ON THE LICENSED PREMISES.
(D) THE LICENSE HOLDER MAY SELL BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR DURING THE
HOURS AND DAYS AS SET OUT FOR A CLASS B BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE
UNDER § 13–2004 OF THIS TITLE.
(E) THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEE IS EQUAL TO THE FEE FOR A CLASS B BEER,
WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE UNDER § 13–902 OF THIS TITLE.
13–1601.
(a) (1) Except as provided in [subsection] SUBSECTIONS (b) AND (C) of this
section, the Board may not issue a license for an establishment that is within 300 feet of a
place of worship or school.
(2) The distance from the establishment to the place of worship or school is
to be measured from the nearest point of the building of the establishment to the nearest
point of the building of the place of worship or school.
(b) The prohibition against issuing a license in subsection (a) of this section does
not apply to:
(1) the renewal or transfer of a license of an establishment if, after issuance
of the license, a place of worship or school was built within 300 feet of the establishment;
(2) the issuance of a temporary license;
(3) a transfer that moves the licensed premises within the same building;
(4) a transfer of ownership of the licensed premises;
(5) the renewal of a Class B beer, wine, and liquor (on–sale) license or a
7–day Class BDR (deluxe restaurant) (on–sale) beer, wine, and liquor license, if the licensed
premises has a seating capacity of more than 50 individuals and is within a town center; or
(6) the transfer, conversion, and issuance of a license under § 13–1710 of
this title; OR
– 3 –

Ch. 797 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(7) THE ISSUANCE OF A LICENSE UNDER § 13–1001.1 OF THIS TITLE
FOR AN ESTABLISHMENT WITHIN 300 FEET OF A PLACE OF WORSHIP, IF THE PLACE
OF WORSHIP CONSENTS IN WRITING TO THE ISSUANCE OF THE LICENSE.
(C) THE PROHIBITION AGAINST ISSUING A LICENSE IN SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE ISSUANCE OF A BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR
LICENSE FOR ON– OR OFF–PREMISES CONSUMPTION FOR AN ESTABLISHMENT THAT
IS WITHIN 300 FEET OF A PLACE OF WORSHIP IF:
(1) THE ESTABLISHMENT IS LOCATED IN THE TOWSON AREA, AS
DETERMINED BY THE BOARD;
(2) THE ESTABLISHMENT IS LOCATED IN AN OFFICE BUILDING THAT
IS AT LEAST 100,000 SQUARE FEET IN SIZE;
(3) THE ESTABLISHMENT HAS A ZONING CLASSIFICATION OF
BM–D.T. BY THE COUNTY GOVERNMENT;
(4) THE PLACE OF WORSHIP CONSENTS IN WRITING TO THE ISSUANCE
OF THE LICENSE; AND
(5) (I) THE LICENSE IS TO APPLY TO A RESTAURANT, A MARKET, OR
ANOTHER SIMILAR ESTABLISHMENT; AND
(II) THE LICENSE IS NOT A CLASS A LICENSE.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 4 –